Arkansas, session 2025, SB55.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas Supreme Court for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q009N SUPREME COURT CLERK 1 GRADE EXE01
(2) Q051C NETWORK ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IST10
(3) Q263C APPELLATE AUTOMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IST08
(4) Q106C DATA POLICY MANAGER 1 GRADE IST08
(5) Q021C APPELLATE REVIEW ATTORNEY II 2 GRADE SPC07
(6) Q011C CRIMINAL COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SPC07
*JAR026*
04-07-2025 17:34:03 JAR026

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB55
(7) Q072C FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE SPC07
(8) Q010C LIBRARY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SPC07
(9) Q035C SUPREME COURT LAW CLERK 14 GRADE SPC07
(10) Q012C SUPREME COURT REPORTER 1 GRADE SPC07
(11) Q037C ASSISTANT CRIMINAL COORDINATOR 2 GRADE SPC05
(12) Q036C CHIEF DEPUTY CLERK 1 GRADE SPC05
(13) Q217C DEPUTY CRIMINAL COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SPC06
(14) Q288C SUPREME COURT HUMAN RESOURCE COORD 1 GRADE SGS11
(15) Q083C COMMUNICATIONS COUNSEL 1 GRADE SPC04
(16) Q038C DEPUTY REPORTER 1 GRADE SPC05
(17) Q090C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO CLERK 1 GRADE SGS08
(18) Q091C JUDICIAL CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE ASSIST 1 GRADE SGS09
(19) Q125C SUPREME COURT POLICE OFFICER 5 GRADE LES04
(20) Q228C DEPUTY CLERK 1 GRADE SGS08
(21) Q108C FINANCIAL SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS09
(22) Q116C JUDICIAL ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT 6 GRADE SGS09
(23) Q109C RECORDS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE SGS09
(24) Q107C ASSISTANT CHIEF DEPUTY CLERK 1 GRADE SGS08
(25) Q122C DATA RESEARCH ANALYST 1 GRADE SGS08
(26) Q192C PUBLIC SERVICE LIBRARIAN 1 GRADE SGS08
(27) Q124C LIBRARY TECHNICAL ASSISTANT 1 GRADE SGS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 51

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas Supreme Court for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: five (5)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas Supreme Court, to be payable from the State Central Services
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Supreme
Court for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
04-07-2025 17:34:03 JAR026

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB55

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,689,830
(02) EXTRA HELP 30,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,483,556
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 417,765
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 55,000
(C) PROF. FEES 25,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 112,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) ARKANSAS REPORTS 229,477
(06) COURT APPOINTED ATTORNEYS 195,000
(07) COMMISSIONS AND COMMITTEES 20,000
(08) SPECIAL JUSTICES 5,500
(09) JUDICIAL EDUCATION 100,000
(10) RECORDS MAINTENANCE TECHNOLOGY 300,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,663,128

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - SUPREME COURT BAR OF ARKANSAS. There is
hereby established for the Arkansas Supreme Court - Bar of Arkansas for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q057N SUPREME COURT DIRECTOR OF OPC 1 GRADE EXE01
(2) Q058N SUPREME COURT DIRECTOR OF OPP 1 GRADE EXE01
(3) Q059N SUPREME COURT DEP DIRECTOR OF OPC 1 GRADE SPC08
(4) Q268C SUPREME COURT ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE SPC07
(5) Q269C SUPREME COURT ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SPC06
(6) Q200C SUPREME COURT DIRECTOR OF AJC 1 GRADE SPC06
(7) Q201C SUPREME COURT DIRECTOR OF JLAP 1 GRADE SPC06
(8) Q199C SUPREME COURT SENIOR STAFF ATTY OPC 1 GRADE SPC06
04-07-2025 17:34:03 JAR026

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB55
(9) Q202C SUPREME COURT STAFF ATTORNEY OPC 2 GRADE SPC05
(10) Q264C HELP DESK APPLICATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS11
(11) Q204C SUPREME COURT DEPUTY DIRECTOR JLAP 1 GRADE SPC05
(12) Q207C SUPREME COURT LICENSING DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SGS11
(13) Q229C SUPREME COURT PROGRAM COORD AJC 1 GRADE SPC04
(14) Q301C SUPREME COURT PROGRAM COORD OPP II 1 GRADE SGS11
(15) Q203C SUPREME COURT PROGRAM COORD OPP I 1 GRADE SGS08
(16) Q270C SUPREME COURT ADMIN ASST/PARALEGAL 1 GRADE SGS09
(17) Q206C SUPREME COURT FINANCIAL SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS09
(18) Q208C SUPREME COURT PARALEGAL OPC 1 GRADE SGS09
(19) Q211C SUPREME COURT ADMIN ASSISTANT AJC 1 GRADE SGS07
(20) Q297C SUPREME COURT ADMIN ASSISTANT OPC 1 GRADE SGS07
(21) Q210C SUPREME COURT ADMIN ASSISTANT OPP 2 GRADE SGS07
(22) Q230C SUPREME COURT ADMIN ASST JLAP 1 GRADE SGS06
(23) Q209C SUPREME COURT INVESTIGATOR OPC 1 GRADE SGS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 25

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP - SUPREME COURT BAR OF ARKANSAS. There is hereby
authorized, for the Arkansas Supreme Court for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: five
(5) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - SUPREME COURT BAR OF ARKANSAS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Supreme Court, to be payable from cash
funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for personal services and
operating expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,886,951
(02) EXTRA HELP 20,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 632,963
04-07-2025 17:34:03 JAR026

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB55
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 750,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 181,700
(C) PROF. FEES 420,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 75,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CONSTRUCTION 75,000
(06) REFUNDS/INVESTMENTS/TRANSFERS 1,690,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,731,614

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
04-07-2025 17:34:03 JAR026

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB55
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee






























04-07-2025 17:34:03 JAR026